Idaho, session 2026, H0754.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-9203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-9203. DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this chapter, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Direct fee" means an agreed-upon fee charged by a primary care
provider as consideration for providing and being available to provide di-
rect primary care services described in a direct primary care agreement.
(2) "Direct primary care agreement" means a written contract between a
primary care provider and an individual patient or a patient's representa-
tive in which the primary care provider agrees to provide direct primary care
services to the patient over a specified period of time for payment of a di-
rect fee.
(3) "Direct primary care services" means those services that a primary
care provider is licensed or otherwise legally authorized to provide and may
include, but are not limited to, such services as screening, assessment, di-
agnosis and treatment for the purpose of promoting health; detection, man-
agement and care of disease or injury; or routine preventive or diagnostic
dental treatment. Such services may be provided in a primary care provider's
office, the patient's home or other locations where a patient visit with the
primary care provider needs to occur.
(4) "Patient" means a person who is entitled to receive direct primary
care services under a direct care agreement.
(5) "Patient's representative" means a person identified in section
39-4504(1)(a) through (g), Idaho Code.
(6) "Primary care provider" means a natural person licensed or other-
wise legally authorized to provide health care services in the state of Idaho
in the field of pediatrics, family medicine, internal medicine, physical
therapy, or dentistry, who provides such services either alone or in profes-
sional association with others in a form and within a scope permitted by such
licensure or legal authorization for the provision of such services, and who
enters into a direct primary care agreement.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.